District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Promoting Parental Engagement at DYRS Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 16-2319 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by adding
a new subsection (e-1) to read as follows:
“(e-1) Following the date of the scheduled predisposition meeting, the Department shall
make a recurring effort at least every 6 months to contact the child’s parent, guardian, or
custodian and inform them of the child’s progress on their individualized rehabilitation plan.”.
Sec. 3. Section 104 of the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services Establishment
Act of 2004, effective April 12, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-335; D.C. Official Code § 2-1515.04), is
amended as follows:
(a) A new paragraph (6A) is added to read as follows:
“(6A) If the child is transferred to a facility other than that indicated in the
individualized rehabilitation plan, making an effort to contact the child’s parent, guardian, or
custodian no later than 24 hours after the change has occurred;”.
(b) Paragraph (19) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon in
its place.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(c) Paragraph (20) is amended by striking the period and inserting a semicolon in its
place.
(d) New paragraphs (21) and (22) are added to read as follows:
“(21) If a child in the custody of the Department is provided with emergency
medical treatment resulting from incidents, injuries, or severe illness, making an effort to contact
the child’s parent, guardian, or custodian within 24 hours; and
“(22) Keeping an electronic log of all efforts made to contact the child’s parent,
guardian, or custodian as required by law and providing a copy of this electronic log to the
child’s parent, guardian, or custodian and the Chair of the Council committee with oversight of
the Department upon request.”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2